Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-331
Norfolk Veterans' Home.

There is hereby established near Norfolk, Nebraska, on the site of the Norfolk Regional Center and further described as follows:

Beginning at a point located approximately one thousand nine hundred twenty feet east of, and approximately nine hundred sixty feet south of the northwest corner of section thirteen, township twenty-four north, range one west in Madison County and thence five hundred feet south along the west curb line of Service Street, thence five hundred feet west, thence five hundred feet north, thence five hundred feet east to the place of beginning; and building number twenty-three located approximately six hundred ninety feet south and three hundred ninety-five feet east of the southeast corner of the above described lot; a facility to be known as the Norfolk Veterans' Home.

Laws 1963, c. 496, § 1, p. 1586;

Laws 1972, LB 1246, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 80-309;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 20.